Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2986
Voluntary dissolution before commencement of activity.

A majority of the organizers or initial directors of a limited cooperative association that has not yet begun activity or the conduct of its affairs may dissolve the limited cooperative association.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 86.